NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/uk_UA/uk_UA_hyph.dic
UTF-8
'ї4в
'ї4д
'ї4ж
'ї4з
'ї4л
'ї4м
'ї4с
'ї4х
.б'8
.бд6
.бе4з'3
.бе4з3
.бе5з4о3д
.бе5зе.
.без3ро4з3
.без5о4соб
.безві4д3
.безу4
.блі4ц3ана
.блі4ц3і4спит
.блі4ц3криг
.блі4ц3опит
.блі4ц3торг
.блі4ц3тур
.бр6
.в'8
.вб6
.вб6'6
.вв6'6
.вг6
.вд6
.вж6
.вз6
.вз6д6
.ви3в4ч
.ви3м4р
.ві4д3
.ві5д4а
.ві5д4ер
.ві5д4і
.ві5д4озв
.ві5д4ом
.ві5д4ун
.від'3
.віді3м4р
.вк6
.вл6
.вм6
.вм6'6
.вп6
.вп6'6
.вп6х6
.вс6
.вс6т6
.вт6
.вш6к6
.д'8
.дж6
.дз6
.дл6
.до3в4ч
.дої4в
.дої4л
.дої5ль
.дс6
.з'8
.за3в4ч
.за3м4р
.зав3м4р
.заї4к
.заї4ц
.заї4ч
.зб6
.зв6'6
.зг6
.зґ6
.зд6
.зд6з6
.зі3м4р
.зл6
.зм6'6
.зс6
.зс6к6
.зс6т6
.зч6
.зш6
.зш6к6
.йш6
.кл6
.кп6
.кс6
.кх6
.кш6
.лк6с6
.лс6
.ль6
.м'8
.мі4ж3
.мс6
.мф6
.н'8
.на3в4ч
.на3м4р
.наї4д
.напі4в3
.нб6
.ом4рі
.п'8
.пе4ом.
.пере3
.пере3м4р
.пере4д'3
.пере4д3бач
.пере4д3виб
.пере4д3г
.пере4д3д
.пере4д3м
.пере4д3ост
.пере4д3пла
.пере4д3пок
.пере4д3р
.пере4д3св
.пере4д3умов
.пере4д3усі
.пере4д3фр
.пере4д3ч
.пі4в3
.пі4д3
.пі5д4е
.пі5д4и
.пі5д4і
.пі5д4о
.пі5д4у
.під'3
.по3в4ч
.по3м4р
.пої4
.пона4д3
.пона5д4и
.пона5д4і
.пона5д4я
.пр6
.при3в4ч
.при3м4р
.пс6
.пх6
.р'8
.ро4з'3
.ро4з3
.ро5з4а
.ро5з4е
.ро5з4і
.роз3м4р
.рт6
.ск6
.ск6л6
.сл6
.сп6
.сп6'6
.сп6л6
.сп6х6
.спі4в3
.ст6
.сх6
.сх6л6
.т'8
.тк6
.тр6
.тх6
.ть6
.ум4ре
.ум4ри
.ум4рі
.ум4ру
.ф'8
.фл6
.хл6
.ць6
.чере4з'3
.чере4з3
.чх6
.ш'8
.шк6
.шл6
.шп6
.шт6
1б
1в
1г
1ґ
1д
1ж
1з
1й
1к
1л
1м
1н
1п
1р
1с
1т
1ф
1х
1ц
1ч
1ш
1щ
2б1б
2в1в
2г1г
2ґ1ґ
2д1д
2ж1ж
2з1з
2й1й
2к1к
2л1л
2м1м
2н1н
2п1п
2р1р
2с1с
2т1т
2ф1ф
2х1х
2ц1ц
2ч1ч
2ш1ш
2щ1щ
3а4вторит
3а4гент
3а4грес
3а4декват
3а4дитив
3а4зарт
3а4ктив
3а4ктуал
3а4курат
3а4куст
3а4кцепт
3а4кциз
3а4лергі
3а4матор
3а4наліз
3а4натом
3а4парат
3а4пеляц
3а4постол
3а4птеч
3а4ргумен
3а4ромат
3а4соці
3а4спект
3а4тлет
3а4халі
3блаж
3ближ
3близ
3блиск
3блок
3блоці
3бран
3брати
3брест
3бризк
3британ
3бруд
3в'4яз
3в4б4лаг
3в4бив
3в4веден
3в4дал
3в4довз
3в4довол
3в4живан
3в4к4лад
3в4лад
3в4ласн
3в4лашт
3в4лов
3в4п4лив
3в4п4равн
3в4певн
3в4поряд
3в4р4одлив
3в4разлив
3в4рожай
3в4сюд
3в4т4рут
3в4т4руч
3в4тіл
3г4ідро
3глад
3глиб
3глин
3глоб
3глуз
3глуш
3гляд
3глян
3гнан
3гнил
3гноз
3гнучк
3грав
3град
3грає
3грай
3грам
3гран
3грати
3граф
3граш
3граю
3грес
3грець
3грів
3гріт
3гріш
3гроб
3грож
3гроз
3громад
3груван
3грунт
3груп
3ґрунт
3д4ан
3д4бав
3д4бає
3д4бал
3д4бан
3д4бат
3двиг
3двій
3двір
3двічі
3двоє
3двою
3ддя
3драж
3дріб
3дріма
3дром
3друж
3друк
3дряп
3е4колог
3е4коном
3е4легант
3е4лектр
3е4лемент
3е4мігр
3е4моці
3е4нерг
3е4стакад
3е4стет
3е4тап
3є4д3н
3є4дин
3є4писк
3є4рей
3жвав
3жміть
3жріть
3з'4ясо
3з4б4роє
3з4б4рой
3з4б4рою
3з4бага
3з4баланс
3з4був
3з4бут
3з4в4'яз
3з4год
3з4дат
3з4дійсн
3з4довж
3з4доров
3з4чеп
3зваж
3зван
3звед
3звел
3звест
3звись
3звич
3звищ
3звіт
3зворуш
3звук
3звуч
3зйом
3змін
3зміш
3знав
3знає
3знай
3знак
3знал
3знан
3знат
3знаход
3знач
3знаю
3зниж
3знім
3зрів
3зріл
3зрін
3зрозум
3зрюв
3і4зотоп
3і4люстр
3і4мовір
3і4ніціат
3і4нтенс
3і4нформ
3і4снув
3ї4ждж
3ї4зд
3ї4ст
3ї4хав
3ї4хат
3й4ма
3й4менн
3й4мищ
3й4міть
3й4мовірн
3й4му.
3й4муть
3й4ш4л
3й4шов
3й6о
3ллє
3ллю
3лля
3м'4якш
3м'4ят
3м4к4не
3м4к4ні
3м4к4ну
3м4нож
3м4ріть
3м4щен
3ння
3о4б'єдн
3о4б'єкт
3о4береж
3о4бира
3о4бід
3о4біц
3о4борон
3о4даль
3о4дяг
3о4збро
3о4крем
3о4перат
3о4плат
3о4птим
3о4пуст
3о4пуше
3о4пуще
3о4рдинац
3о4ренд
3о4соб
3о4сяжн
3о4холо
3о4хорон
3о4хоч
3о4чисн
3о4чищ
3п4ре
3п4ри
3п4рі
3п4ро
3п4с4ков
3п4сов
3п4сон
3п4сув
3р4вав
3р4вати
3р4віть
3с4к4лад
3с4к4ле
3с4к4лит
3с4к4ло
3с4к4рипт
3с4кид
3с4кіль
3с4кіпл
3с4кок
3с4коп
3с4кор
3с4короч
3с4коч
3с4п4лав
3с4п4лат
3с4п4лач
3с4п4рав
3с4п4ритн
3с4п4рият
3с4п4ромо
3с4пад
3с4пект
3с4перм
3с4пин
3с4пі
3с4піть
3с4піш
3с4повід
3с4пожив
3с4постер
3с4промож
3с4т4вор
3с4т4ражд
3с4т4рах
3с4т4риб
3с4т4риж
3с4т4рій
3с4т4ріл
3с4т4річ
3с4т4роє
3с4т4рої
3с4т4рой
3с4т4рок
3с4т4ром
3с4т4роф
3с4т4роч
3с4т4рою
3с4т4роя
3с4т4рукт
3с4т4рукц
3с4табіл
3с4тав
3с4тад
3с4тає
3с4таз
3с4тайн
3с4тал
3с4тан
3с4тар
3с4тара
3с4тат
3с4тач
3с4теп
3с4тереж
3с4теріг
3с4тиг
3с4тиж
3с4тисл
3с4титу
3с4тіб
3с4тій
3с4тіль
3с4тір
3с4товб
3с4той
3с4торін
3с4торон
3с4тосо
3с4тосу
3с4тою
3с4тоян
3с4туп
3с4тяг
3с4фер
3с4хил
3с4хід
3с4хов
3т4к4нен
3т4кан
3т4ь4мар
3т4ь4мяні
3ттю
3ття
3у4ваг
3у4важ
3у4гав
3у4згод
3у4клад
3у4компл
3у4крупн
3у4люблен
3у4мит
3у4міл
3у4п4рав
3у4перед
3у4разлив
3у4рбан
3у4рочист
3у4ряд
3у4рядов
3у4спіш
3у4станов
3у4стпіш
3у4сувати
3у4твор
3у4тробн
3х4то
3ш4кідл
3ш4кіл
3ш4кір
3ш4код
3ш4кол
3ш4таб
3ш4туч
3я4дерн
3я4зик
3я4кіс
3я4рус
3я4скрав
4в3антрац
4д7зем
6'
6б6ль.
6б6с6тв.
6б6с6тр.
6б6с6ьк.
6б6ст.
6б6ць.
6бв.
6бз.
6бй.
6бл.
6бн.
6бр.
6бс.
6в6др.
6в6дь.
6в6зь.
6в6ль.
6в6с6тв.
6в6с6ть.
6в6с6ьк.
6в6сь.
6в6ць.
6вб.
6вв.
6вд.
6вж.
6вз.
6вй.
6вк.
6вл.
6вм.
6вн.
6вп.
6вр.
6вс.
6вт.
6вх.
6вч.
6вш.
6вщ.
6г6ль.
6г6с6тв.
6г6сь.
6гв.
6гг.
6гд.
6гл.
6гм.
6гн.
6гр.
6гс.
6гт.
6д6зь.
6д6с6тв.
6д6с6ьк.
6д6ь6сь.
6дж.
6дз.
6дл.
6дм.
6дн.
6др.
6дт.
6дь.
6ж6дь.
6ж6сь.
6жб.
6жв.
6з6дв.
6з6дн.
6з6дь.
6з6нь.
6з6сь.
6з6ьб.
6з6ьк.
6зв.
6зг.
6зд.
6зк.
6зл.
6зм.
6зн.
6зр.
6зь.
6й6кл.
6й6ль.
6й6мс.
6й6нс.
6й6с6тв.
6й6с6тр.
6й6с6ьк.
6й6ст.
6й6сь.
6й6тс.
6йб.
6йв.
6йг.
6йд.
6йз.
6йк.
6йл.
6йм.
6йн.
6йп.
6йр.
6йс.
6йт.
6йф.
6йх.
6йц.
6йч.
6йш.
6к6ль.
6к6ст.
6к6сь.
6к6тр.
6кв.
6кк.
6кл.
6кр.
6кс.
6кт.
6кх.
6кш.
6л6ль.
6л6мс.
6л6хв.
6л6ь6дс.
6л6ь6ств.
6л6ь6сь.
6л6ь6ськ.
6л6ь6тр.
6л6ьб.
6л6ьв.
6л6ьг.
6л6ьд.
6л6ьз.
6л6ьк.
6л6ьм.
6л6ьн.
6л6ьп.
6л6ьс.
6л6ьт.
6л6ьф.
6л6ьх.
6л6ьц.
6л6ьч.
6л6ьш.
6л6ьщ.
6лб.
6лг.
6лд.
6лк.
6лл.
6лм.
6лн.
6лп.
6лс.
6лт.
6ль.
6м6б6ль.
6м6бр.
6м6ль.
6м6с6тв.
6м6с6ьк.
6м6сь.
6мб.
6мг.
6мж.
6мк.
6мл.
6мм.
6мн.
6мп.
6мр.
6мс.
6мт.
6мф.
6мх.
6мш.
6н6г6ль.
6н6гл.
6н6гр.
6н6гс.
6н6дж.
6н6дз.
6н6дп.
6н6др.
6н6кс.
6н6кт.
6н6с6тв.
6н6с6тр.
6н6с6ьк.
6н6с6ькй.
6н6ск.
6н6ст.
6н6т6ств.
6н6тк.
6н6тр.
6н6ть.
6н6ць.
6н6ь6сь.
6н6ьб.
6н6ьг.
6н6ьк.
6нв.
6нг.
6нд.
6нж.
6нз.
6нк.
6нм.
6нн.
6нр.
6нс.
6нт.
6нф.
6нх.
6нц.
6нч.
6нш.
6нь.
6п6с6тв.
6п6сь.
6п6тр.
6пд.
6пл.
6пр.
6пс.
6пт.
6пф.
6пц.
6р6дв.
6р6дж.
6р6дь.
6р6зн.
6р6зь.
6р6кс.
6р6кт.
6р6л6ьз.
6р6ль.
6р6н6ст.
6р6нс.
6р6нь.
6р6с6тв.
6р6с6ть.
6р6с6ьк.
6р6ср.
6р6ст.
6р6сь.
6р6тв.
6р6тр.
6р6ть.
6р6ць.
6р6щ6сь.
6рб.
6рв.
6рг.
6рд.
6рж.
6рз.
6рк.
6рл.
6рм.
6рн.
6рп.
6рр.
6рс.
6рт.
6рф.
6рх.
6рц.
6рч.
6рш.
6рщ.
6рь.
6с6д6рп.
6с6дп.
6с6ль.
6с6т6рь.
6с6тв.
6с6тй.
6с6тм.
6с6тр.
6с6ть.
6с6ць.
6с6ьб.
6с6ьк.
6с6ьм.
6ск.
6сл.
6см.
6сн.
6сп.
6сс.
6ст.
6сь.
6т6вт.
6т6зт.
6т6ль.
6т6мр.
6т6с6тв.
6т6с6ьк.
6т6ь6сь.
6тв.
6тл.
6тм.
6тр.
6тс.
6тт.
6тц.
6тч.
6ть.
6ф6с6тв.
6ф6ть.
6фм.
6фр.
6фт.
6фф.
6фь.
6хв.
6хм.
6хн.
6хр.
6хт.
6хш.
6ц6тв.
6ц6ьк.
6ць.
6чб.
6чм.
6чн.
6чт.
6ш6ль.
6ш6нл.
6ш6сь.
6ш6тв.
6шв.
6шм.
6шн.
6шт.
6щ6сь.
6ь
а1
а2й
а3і4стор
а3у4дар
аа4дрес
абия4к
аві4а
авої4д
ае4тил
ае4фект
ай4с3берг
альбі5он
ана3в4ч
ао4браз
ао4пис
ао4пік
ао4ха
ао4хот
ао4щад
ар4т3афіш
ар4т3взвод
ар4т3десант
ар4т3кафе
ар4т3майс
ар4т3медіа
ар4т3мейс
ар4т3мейст
ар4т3мін
ар4т3о4бстр
ар4т3о4дин
ар4т3о4збр
ар4т3під
ар4т3рин
ар4т3у4стан
ар4т3факт
ар4т3хім
ар4т3центр
ау4год
ау4т3екол
ауді4о
ахої4д
б'4єть
ба4с3антра
ба4с3енер
баге4р3мейст
бак3а4наліз
бактері4о
бале4т3мейст
бальне4о
бе4з5і4дей
бе5кон
без3а4дрес
без5і4мен
беза4варі
безві4д3
безе4місі
безу4гл
безу4пин
бей4сбол
бі4о3
біблі4о
бйор4нс
бло4к3пост
бо4г3дан
бо4є3гол
бо4є3гот
бо4є3зап
бо4є3здат
бо4є3комп
бо4є3пост
бо4є3прип
бо4р4т3і4нж
бо4р4т3мех
бо4р4т3о4пер
бо4р4т3про
бо4р4т3рад
бори4с5п
бран4д
бран4д3мейст
брі4дж3порт
в3м'4я
в3у4дар
ва4ль4д3мейст
ве4ль4т3мейст
вер4х3н
ви3й4д
ви3й4т
ви3у4ч
виї4
вий4м
вина3й4д
вина3й4т
виу4ди
вия4в
вия4сн
ві5д4е4о
ві5д4ен
ві5д4ом
від3в'4я
від5о4браж
від5о4браз
від7зна
віду4ч
во4євод
во4єнач
во4с5ко
во4станнє
водо5з4бір
водо5с4ток
воль4т3ампер
воль4т3метр
ге2ть3ман
ге4о
гелі4о
ген3а4наліз
гі4д5ро5мет
гіпер3а4кт
гіпер3е4місі
го4с4п5роз
го4ф3мейст
гоме4о
гос4п3у4год
граф3о4браз
гро4с3мейст
д3у4сім
д4ж
д4з
д4ні3п4р
д4о3й4м
двох4а5том
декре4т3мейст
дер4ж3без
дер4ж3резерв
дер4ж5а4дм
дер4ж5а4том
дер4ж5бюдж
дер4ж5вид
дер4ж5дум
дер4ж5замов
дер4ж5ком
дер4ж5нафт
дер4ж5реєс
дер4ж5служ
дер4ж5стр
дея4к
джен4тль
ди4с3гарм
ди4с3квал
ди4с3комф
ди4с3конт
ди4с3кред
ди4с3крет
ди4с3крец
ди4с3крим
ди4с3кусі
ди4с3куту
ди4с3лок
ди4с3парит
ди4с3перс
ди4с3петч
ди4с3пле
ди4с3плей
ди4с3пози
ди4с3проп
ди4с3пут
ди4с3тил
ди4с3триб
ди4с3троф
ди4с3функц
дисбаланс
ді3й4д
ді3й4т
ді4алог
ді4єві4д3
ді4о
ді4оген
дій4ма
до3в'4є
до3в'4ю
до3з4віл
до3з4вол
до4к3мейст
до5о4р
дої4д
дої4ж
дої4м
дої4ст
дої4х
дорого5в4каз
доу4к
доу4м
е1
е2й
е3в4каз
е3і4стор
е3м4рій
е3о4кисл
еа4варі
еа4дрес
еа4кт
еви3в4ч
едо3в4ч
ее4місі
ее4стет
ее4фект
еі4стот
ек2с1к
ек2с1п
ек2с1т
ек2с1ц
ена3в4ч
енерго3з4береж
енерго3з4беріг
ень7о4кисл
ео4браз
ео4бур
ео4голош
ео4зор
ео4пал
ео4пис
ео4плачув
ео4сві
ео4ха
ео4хот
ео4цін
ео4щад
еті4о
еу4бог
еу4год
еу4стр
є1
є2й
єв4р3атом
єге4р3мейст
єпи4с5коп
єпі4с5коп
жко4м5а4том
жона3в4ч
з'4єдн
з'я4в
з3а4кт
з3а4наліз
з3в'4я
з3м'4я
з3у4дар
за3в'4є
за3в'4ю
за3в'4я
за3м'4я
за3у4ч
за3ю4ш
за3я4ло
за4вві4д3
за4п3част
за5о4р
заї4д
заї4ж
заї4з
заї4л
заї4м
заї4х
зай4м
зай4ня
зая4в
здій4ня
зе4кономити
зі3в'4є
зі3в'4ю
зі3в'4я
зі3м'4я
зна3й4д
зна3й4т
зо4ка
зо4ке
зо4ки
зо4кі
зо4ку
зо6о
зу4роч
и1
и2й
и3і4стор
и3о4кисл
иа4варі
игої4д
ие4місі
ие4стет
ий4ня
ий4ти
і1
і2й
і3і4стор
і4л3е4тил
і4он
іа4дрес
іе4тил
ій4ти
інтер3в'4ю
інфор4м3аген
іо4ктан
іона3в4ч
ї1
ї2й
й3е4стет
й3у4бог
йо4сві
ка5нал
каза4х3стан
капе4ль3мейст
квар4т3плат
кварти4р3мейст
квої4д
киї4венер
кому4ненерг
кон4тр3арг
кон4трре
контр3у4дар
конце4р4т3мейст
корої4д
коу4роч
кра4н3мейст
м3а4наліз
мете4о
мі4н5е4ко
мі4н5е4нер
мі4о
між3а4варі
між3а4наліз
міжу4соб
мо4к5рий
мона3в4ч
на3б4лиз
на3в'4ю
на3в'4я
на3в4ряд
на3в4ча
на3в4чен
на3в4чіть
на3д4бан
на3з4в
на3м'4я
на3у4ч
на4д'3
на4д7з4в
на4й3а
на4й3е
на4й3масл
на4й3обереж
на4й3спри
на4й3у4бог
на4й3якіс
на4й7о4бер
на4й7о4гид
на4й7о4гол
на4й7о4гряд
на4й7о4пук
на4й7о4хай
на5п4лив
над3а4варі
наді4стор
наді4стот
наду4роч
наї4вс
наї4вш
наї4ж
наї4з
наї4л
наї4м
наї4с
наї4х
най3е4фект
най3і4стор
най3о4браз
най3о4станн
най3я4сн
най4ма
най4ня
найа4кт
найі4стот
нао4р
напів3а4варі
напоу4м
ная4в
не3в4том
не3д4бан
не3з4важ
не3з4вич
не3у4ч
не4оклас
не4окомун
не4оландш
не4олібер
не4оліт
не4олог
не4омальт
не4онац
не4офіт
неа4би
неві4д'3
неві4д3
недо3у4ч
недої4
неї4ст
нео4пал
непо3в'4я
неу4к
нею4н
нея4к
нея4рок
нея4сн
ні4т5рат
нія4к
но3м'4я
но4к3а4ут
нт3а4наліз
о1
о2й
о3а4наліз
о3в4каз
о3і4стор
о3о4кисл
о3у4дар
оа4варі
оа4дрес
оа4каці
оа4кт
оа4на
оа4том
об'3
об3в'4я
об3м'4я
об4л3а4дмін
об4лдер4ж
об5у4мов
обі3в'4є
обі3д4ран
обі3й4д
обі3й4т
обій4м
обій4ня
обой4м
ови3в4ч
ові4д3
од'3
ое4ко
ое4місі
ое4стет
ое4фект
оза3в4ч
оі4зол
оі4стот
онаї4д
оної4д
оо4б
оо4біг
оо4браз
оо4держ
оо4динок
оо4к
оо4ктан
оо4пал
оо4пис
оо4плачув
оо4сві
оо4цін
оо4чист
оо4чищ
ооб'3
ооб3м
ооб3ро
оу4год
оу4ком
оу4с
оу4стр
оу4сун
п4о5бере
па4н3о4тець
пале4о
пан3е4стет
пар3е4стет
пед3у4чи
пере3в4том
пере3й4д
пере3й4т
пере3м'4я
пере3у4ч
пере4д5см
пере5о4р
пере5п4лив
перег4ній
перед3а4варі
перед3і4стор
перед3о4пла
перед3о4станн
перед5о4бід
перед5у4мов
переї4д
переї4ж
переї4з
переї4л
переї4с
переї4х
перей4м
перей4ня
пі5в4ень
пі5в4оні
пі6д5о4р
пів3і4стор
пів3о4вал
пів3у4год
пів5о4с4тр
піва4кт
піво4с
під3в'4я
під3у4ч
під5о4дин
піді3м'4я
підій4ня
пій4м
по3б4лизу
по3в'4є
по3в'4ю
по3в'4я
по3в4тор
по3в4ча
по3в4чен
по3в4чіть
по3д4во
по3д4раз
по3д4роб
по3м'4я
по4с4т3декр
по4с4т3контра
по4с4т3менопауз
по4с4т3раді
по4с4т5кому
по4с4т5радян
по4с4т5соці
по4с4тприват
по4ш4т3мейст
по5ж4ніть
по5з4бав
по5о4р
позау4роч
пої4д
пої4зд
полі3а4наліз
полі4о
полі4т5екон
полі4ц3мейст
пор4т3н
пор4т3рет
пор4т3фел
пос4т3кап
пос4т3ком
пос4т3нат
пос4т3проц
пос4т3соц
пос4т3фікс
пост3а4варі
пост3і4стор
поу4роч
поч4не
поч4ни
поч4ну
поя4в
поя4с
поя4сн
пр4о5плат
пре4й4с
при3в'4я
при3й4д
при3й4т
при3м'4я
при4нцип
приї4
прий4м
прио4р
приу4роч
про3б4лем
про3с4тирад
про4ект3н
про4м3май
про4ф3ві4д3
про4ф3с
прої4
прой4м
проя4сн
раді4о
рай3в4но
ре3а4наліз
рмої4д
ро4з'5єдн
ро4з3гром
ро4з3лив
ро4з5вер
ро4з5гор
ро4з5д4во
ро4з5діл
ро4з5мінний
ро4з5чеп
ро5з4йом
ро5з4о5рам
ро5з4ора.
ро5з4орах
ро5з4ори
ро5з4орі
ро5з4оро
ро5з4ору
ро5з4орю
ро5з4оря
ро5з4ум
ро6з5о4ри.
роз'я4р
роз'я4сн
роз3у4год
роз5вант
роз5вин
роз5вит
роз5і4мен
роз5у4чен
розо4ра
розо4ре
